Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.269

Directors and committee members—Limitations on personal liability—Exceptions.

(1) Directors and committee members at a credit union or federal credit union have no personal liability for harm caused by acts or omissions performed on behalf of the credit union if: The director or committee member was acting within the scope of his or her duties at the time of the act or omission; the harm was not caused by an act in violation of RCW 31.12.267; the harm was not caused by willful or criminal misconduct, gross negligence, reckless misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety of the individual harmed; and the harm was not caused by the director or committee member's operation of a motor vehicle, vessel, aircraft, or other vehicle for which the state requires the operator or the owner of the vehicle, craft, or vessel to either possess an operator's license or maintain insurance.

(2) This section does not affect a director's or committee member's liability to the credit union or to a governmental entity for harm to the credit union or governmental entity caused by the director or committee member.

(3) This section does not affect the vicarious liability of the credit union with respect to harm caused to any person, including harm caused by the negligence of a director or committee member.

(4) This section does not affect the liability of employees of the credit union for acts or omissions done within the scope of their employment.

[ 2001 c 120 s 1.]